District of Columbia statutes.
44-715

Congressional policy as to appropriations to churches or religious entities.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the government of the United States to make no appropriation of money or property for the purpose of founding, maintaining, or aiding by payment for services, expenses, or otherwise, any church or religious denomination, or any institution or society which is under sectarian or ecclesiastical control; and no money appropriated for charitable purposes in the District of Columbia shall be paid to any church or religious denomination, or to any institution or society which is under sectarian or ecclesiastical control.

June 11, 1896, 29 Stat. 411, ch. 419, § 1
Mar. 3, 1897, 29 Stat. 683, ch. 387, § 1
1981 Ed., § 32-1207.
1973 Ed., § 32-1008.